Connecticut, session 2026, SB00508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 14-111 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection,
whenever the holder of any motor vehicle operator's license has been
convicted or has forfeited any bond taken or has received a suspended
judgment or sentence for any of the following violations, the
commissioner shall, without hearing, suspend such person's operator's
license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state as follows:
For a first violation of subsection (a) or subdivision (1) of subsection (b)
of section 14-224 or section 14-110, 14-215 or 53a-119b, for a period of
not less than one year and, for a subsequent violation thereof, for a
period of not less than two years; for a third and any subsequent
violation of subsection (a) of section 14-279, for a period of six months;
for a violation of section 14-222, for a period of not less than thirty days
or more than ninety days and, for a subsequent violation thereof, for a
period of not less than ninety days; for a violation of subdivision (2) or

Substitute Senate Bill No. 508
(3) of subsection (b) of section 14-224, for a period of not less than ninety
days and for a subsequent violation thereof, for a period of not less than
one year; for a first or second violation of subsection (c) of section 14-
224, for a period of forty-five days and for a subsequent violation
thereof, for a period of two years; for a first violation of subsection (b),
(d) or (e) of section 14-147, for a period of not less than ninety days and,
for a subsequent violation thereof, for a period of not less than five years;
for a first violation of subsection (c) of section 14-147, for a period of not
less than thirty days and, for a subsequent violation thereof, for a period
of not less than one year.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14-111b and except as
provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, whenever the holder of
any motor vehicle operator's license or youth instruction permit who is
less than eighteen years of age or whenever a person who does not hold
an operator's license who is less than eighteen years of age has been
convicted or has forfeited any bond taken or has received a suspended
judgment or sentence for any of the following violations, the
commissioner shall suspend such person's operator's license or
privilege to obtain an operator's license as follows: For a first violation
of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 14-219 or subdivision (4)
of subsection (b) of section 14-219, for a period of sixty days and, for a
second violation thereof, for a period of ninety days and, for a third or
subsequent violation thereof, for a period of six months; for a first
violation of section 14-222, for a period of six months and, for a
subsequent violation thereof, for a period of one year; for a violation of
subsection (c) of section 14-224, for a period of six months and, for a
subsequent violation thereof, for a period of one year; for a first violation
of section 14-296aa, for a period of thirty days and, for a second violation
thereof, for a period of ninety days and, for a third or subsequent
violation thereof, for a period of six months.
(3) The commissioner shall suspend the motor vehicle operator's
Public Act No. 26-95 2 of 3

Substitute Senate Bill No. 508
license of any youth adjudged a youthful offender for a violation of
section 14-215 or 14-222, subsection (b) of section 14-223 or subdivision
(2) or (3) of subsection (b) or subsection (c) of section 14-224 for six
months for a first offense and one year for a second or subsequent
offense.
(4) Whenever any person who has not been issued a motor vehicle
operator's license under section 14-36 is convicted of a second or
subsequent violation of subsection (a) of section 14-36: (A) The
commissioner shall suspend such person's privilege to operate a motor
vehicle, (B) such suspension shall remain in effect for a period of ninety
days, and (C) the commissioner shall not issue an operator's license to
such person under section 14-36 until such period of suspension has
expired and all applicable requirements for such license have been
satisfied by such person.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-95 3 of 3